Hawaii statutes.
§664-33 Procedure; notice. The circuit
courts shall hear and determine all controversies respecting rights of private
way and water rights, between private individuals, or between private
individuals and the State. Any person interested, or the State, may apply for
the settlement of any rights involved hereunder by filing a complaint in the
circuit court of the circuit in which the property affected is situated.
Thereupon the court shall issue a summons to each land owner or occupant having
an interest in the controversy. A notice of the pending action may be
published in any case in the discretion of the court. [L 1886, c 69, §3; am L
1888, c 26, §3; am L 1907, c 56, §3; RL 1925, §2938; RL 1935, §3679; RL 1945,
§10220; RL 1955, §234-32; HRS §664-33; am L 1972, c 90, §6(n)]

Cross References

Publication, see §601-13.

Case Notes

"Within their respective circuits", limiting effect
of. 32 H. 404 (1932), aff'd 52 F.2d 356 (1931).

Duties discussed. 5 H. 130 (1884). There must be
controversy. 18 H. 30 (1906). Notice of hearing. 3 H. 216 (1870); 7 H. 266
(1888). No jurisdiction to award damages for obstructing right-of-way. 7 H.
270 (1888). Or for wrongful diversion of water. 5 H. 216 (1884).
Jurisdiction not exclusive as to water rights. 10 H. 476 (1896); 19 H. 106
(1908); 32 H. 404 (1932), aff'd 52 F.2d 356 (1931). Decision must be in
accordance with vested rights. 13 H. 214 (1900); 15 H. 554 (1903). And shall
be just and equitable. 5 H. 176 (1884); 5 H. 216 (1884); 6 H. 185 (1876). Must
be responsive to prayer. 11 H. 644 (1899) (prior to Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure).

Rights-of-way. Use of right-of-way by owner to whom land
conveyed, described as bounded by the way. 8 H. 75 (1890). Opening of the old
right-of-way. 8 H. 91 (1890). Inequitable to award a right-of-way over
another's land causing removal of buildings when it can be avoided. 8 H. 267
(1891). Implied grant of way in actual use. 9 H. 191 (1893). Right-of-way by
necessity awarded. 9 H. 490 (1894).

Right-of-way cases generally. 1 H. 508 (1856); 2 H. 9
(1857); 2 H. 307 (1860); 2 H. 378 (1861); 4 H. 79 (1878); 4 H. 417 (1881); 4 H.
457 (1882); 5 H. 176 (1884); 5 H. 293 (1885); 5 H. 394 (1885); 8 H. 75 (1890);
8 H. 91 (1890); 8 H. 267 (1891); 9 H. 191 (1893); 9 H. 490 (1894); 13 H. 214
(1900); 18 H. 354 (1907).

Water rights. Well settled law that right to use water for
irrigation purposes can be acquired by adverse and continuous use. 8 H. 447
(1892). Person in possession under claim of title of land to which alleged
water right is appurtenant is an "interested" party, and obstructing
of conduit through which water is entitled to flow is a "controversy
respecting water rights". 11 H. 475 (1898).

Diversion of water from natural course, enjoined. 8 H. 310
(1891). Right to natural flow of water from upper land. 8 H. 498 (1892); 8 H.
658 (1867). Reversioner, no right of action where no injury to the
inheritance. 9 H. 628 (1895). Method of use of water established by
prescription. 9 H. 651 (1895). Water right not lost by omission to exercise
it when not needed. 9 H. 651 (1895). No right to enjoin diversion to cane
land of water to which uncultivated taro land is entitled. 10 H. 265 (1896).

Property owners have riparian rights. 54 H. 174, 504 P.2d
1330 (1973).

Storm and freshet waters belong to State. 54 H. 174, 504
P.2d 1330 (1973).

Water rights of maheled lands. 54 H. 174, 504 P.2d 1330
(1973).

Water right cases generally: 3 H. 216 (1870); 3 H. 479
(1873); 4 H. 415 (1881); 4 H. 504 (1882); 5 H. 13 (1883); 5 H. 133 (1884); 5 H.
200 (1884); 6 H. 185 (1876); 6 H. 346 (1882); 8 H. 310 (1891); 8 H. 447 (1892);
8 H. 498 (1892); 8 H. 658 (1867); 9 H. 628 (1895); 9 H. 651 (1895); 10 H. 133
(1895); 10 H. 453 (1896); 11 H. 475 (1898); 11 H. 644 (1899); 14 H. 50 (1902);
15 H. 554 (1903); 15 H. 675 (1904); 20 H. 658 (1911); 24 H. 47 (1917); 25 H.
726, 734 (1921); 31 H. 376 (1930); 32 H. 404 (1932), aff'd 52 F.2d 356 (1931).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next